test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
  Nouns:
      abt+N+Sg+Nom: abt
      abt+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: abtki
      abt+N+Pl+Par: abte
      abt+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: abtegi
      abt+N+Sg+Com: abtiga
      abt+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: abtigagi
      abt+N+Sg+Abe: abtita
      abt+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: abtitagi
      abt+N+Sg+Ess: abtina
      abt+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: abtinagi
      abt+N+Sg+Trm: abtini
      abt+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: abtinigi
      abt+N+Sg+Tra: abtiks
      abt+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: abtikski
      abt+N+Sg+Abl: abtilt
      abt+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: abtiltki
      abt+N+Sg+Ade: abtil
      abt+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: abtilgi
      abt+N+Sg+All: abtile
      abt+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: abtilegi
      abt+N+Sg+Ela: abtist
      abt+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: abtistki
      abt+N+Sg+Ine: abtis
      abt+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: abtiski
      abt+N+Sg+Ill: abti
      abt+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: abtigi
      abt+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: abtissegi
      abt+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: abtisse
      abt+N+Sg+Gen: abti
      abt+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: abtigi
      abt+N+Sg+Par: abti
      abt+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: abtigi
      abt+N+Pl+Nom: abtid
      abt+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: abtidki
      abt+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: abtisidki
      abt+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: abtisid
      abt+N+Pl+Com: abtidega
      abt+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: abtidegagi
      abt+N+Pl+Abe: abtideta
      abt+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: abtidetagi
      abt+N+Pl+Ess: abtidena
      abt+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: abtidenagi
      abt+N+Pl+Trm: abtideni
      abt+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: abtidenigi
      abt+N+Pl+Tra: abtideks
      abt+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: abtidekski
      abt+N+Pl+Abl: abtidelt
      abt+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: abtideltki
      abt+N+Pl+Ade: abtidel
      abt+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: abtidelgi
      abt+N+Pl+All: abtidele
      abt+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: abtidelegi
      abt+N+Pl+Ela: abtidest
      abt+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: abtidestki
      abt+N+Pl+Ine: abtides
      abt+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: abtideski
      abt+N+Pl+Ill: abtidesse
      abt+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: abtidessegi
      abt+N+Pl+Gen: abtide
      abt+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: abtidegi
      õhk+N+Sg+Nom: õhk
      õhk+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: õhkki
      õhk+N+Sg+Ill: õhku
      õhk+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: õhkugi
      õhk+N+Sg+Par: õhku
      õhk+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: õhkugi
      õhk+N+Pl+Par: õhkusid
      õhk+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: õhkusidki
      õhk+N+Pl+Com: õhkudega
      õhk+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: õhkudegagi
      õhk+N+Pl+Abe: õhkudeta
      õhk+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: õhkudetagi
      õhk+N+Pl+Ess: õhkudena
      õhk+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: õhkudenagi
      õhk+N+Pl+Trm: õhkudeni
      õhk+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: õhkudenigi
      õhk+N+Pl+Tra: õhkudeks
      õhk+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: õhkudekski
      õhk+N+Pl+Abl: õhkudelt
      õhk+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: õhkudeltki
      õhk+N+Pl+Ade: õhkudel
      õhk+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: õhkudelgi
      õhk+N+Pl+All: õhkudele
      õhk+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: õhkudelegi
      õhk+N+Pl+Ela: õhkudest
      õhk+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: õhkudestki
      õhk+N+Pl+Ine: õhkudes
      õhk+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: õhkudeski
      õhk+N+Pl+Ill: õhkudesse
      õhk+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: õhkudessegi
      õhk+N+Pl+Gen: õhkude
      õhk+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: õhkudegi
      õhk+N+Sg+Com: õhuga
      õhk+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: õhugagi
      õhk+N+Sg+Abe: õhuta
      õhk+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: õhutagi
      õhk+N+Sg+Ess: õhuna
      õhk+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: õhunagi
      õhk+N+Sg+Trm: õhuni
      õhk+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: õhunigi
      õhk+N+Sg+Tra: õhuks
      õhk+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: õhukski
      õhk+N+Sg+Abl: õhult
      õhk+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: õhultki
      õhk+N+Sg+Ade: õhul
      õhk+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: õhulgi
      õhk+N+Sg+All: õhule
      õhk+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: õhulegi
      õhk+N+Sg+Ela: õhust
      õhk+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: õhustki
      õhk+N+Sg+Ine: õhus
      õhk+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: õhuski
      õhk+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: õhussegi
      õhk+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: õhusse
      õhk+N+Sg+Gen: õhu
      õhk+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: õhugi
      õhk+N+Pl+Nom: õhud
      õhk+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: õhudki
      õukond+N+Sg+Nom: õukond
      õukond+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: õukondki
      õukond+N+Sg+Ill: õukonda
      õukond+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: õukondagi
      õukond+N+Sg+Par: õukonda
      õukond+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: õukondagi
      õukond+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: õukondasidki
      õukond+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: õukondasid
      õukond+N+Pl+Com: õukondadega
      õukond+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: õukondadegagi
      õukond+N+Pl+Abe: õukondadeta
      õukond+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: õukondadetagi
      õukond+N+Pl+Ess: õukondadena
      õukond+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: õukondadenagi
      õukond+N+Pl+Trm: õukondadeni
      õukond+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: õukondadenigi
      õukond+N+Pl+Tra: õukondadeks
      õukond+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: õukondadekski
      õukond+N+Pl+Abl: õukondadelt
      õukond+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: õukondadeltki
      õukond+N+Pl+Ade: õukondadel
      õukond+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: õukondadelgi
      õukond+N+Pl+All: õukondadele
      õukond+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: õukondadelegi
      õukond+N+Pl+Ela: õukondadest
      õukond+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: õukondadestki
      õukond+N+Pl+Ine: õukondades
      õukond+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: õukondadeski
      õukond+N+Pl+Ill: õukondadesse
      õukond+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: õukondadessegi
      õukond+N+Pl+Gen: õukondade
      õukond+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: õukondadegi
      õukond+N+Pl+Par: õukondi
      õukond+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: õukondigi
      õukond+N+Sg+Com: õukonnaga
      õukond+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: õukonnagagi
      õukond+N+Sg+Abe: õukonnata
      õukond+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: õukonnatagi
      õukond+N+Sg+Ess: õukonnana
      õukond+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: õukonnanagi
      õukond+N+Sg+Trm: õukonnani
      õukond+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: õukonnanigi
      õukond+N+Sg+Tra: õukonnaks
      õukond+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: õukonnakski
      õukond+N+Sg+Abl: õukonnalt
      õukond+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: õukonnaltki
      õukond+N+Sg+Ade: õukonnal
      õukond+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: õukonnalgi
      õukond+N+Sg+All: õukonnale
      õukond+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: õukonnalegi
      õukond+N+Sg+Ela: õukonnast
      õukond+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: õukonnastki
      õukond+N+Sg+Ine: õukonnas
      õukond+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: õukonnaski
      õukond+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: õukonnassegi
      õukond+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: õukonnasse
      õukond+N+Sg+Gen: õukonna
      õukond+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: õukonnagi
      õukond+N+Pl+Nom: õukonnad
      õukond+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: õukonnadki
      aasta+N+Sg+Com: aastaga
      aasta+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: aastagagi
      aasta+N+Sg+Abe: aastata
      aasta+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: aastatagi
      aasta+N+Sg+Ess: aastana
      aasta+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: aastanagi
      aasta+N+Sg+Trm: aastani
      aasta+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: aastanigi
      aasta+N+Sg+Tra: aastaks
      aasta+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: aastakski
      aasta+N+Sg+Abl: aastalt
      aasta+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: aastaltki
      aasta+N+Sg+Ade: aastal
      aasta+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: aastalgi
      aasta+N+Sg+All: aastale
      aasta+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: aastalegi
      aasta+N+Sg+Ela: aastast
      aasta+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: aastastki
      aasta+N+Sg+Ine: aastas
      aasta+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: aastaski
      aasta+N+Sg+Ill: aastasse
      aasta+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: aastassegi
      aasta+N+Sg+Gen: aasta
      aasta+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: aastagi
      aasta+N+Sg+Nom: aasta
      aasta+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: aastagi
      aasta+N+Sg+Par: aastat
      aasta+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: aastatki
      aasta+N+Pl+Nom: aastad
      aasta+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: aastadki
      aasta+N+Pl+Par: aastaid
      aasta+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: aastaidki
      aasta+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: aastaiks
      aasta+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastaikski
      aasta+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: aastailt
      aasta+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastailtki
      aasta+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: aastail
      aasta+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastailgi
      aasta+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: aastaile
      aasta+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastailegi
      aasta+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: aastaist
      aasta+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastaistki
      aasta+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: aastais
      aasta+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastaiski
      aasta+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: aastaisse
      aasta+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aastaissegi
      aasta+N+Pl+Com: aastatega
      aasta+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: aastategagi
      aasta+N+Pl+Abe: aastateta
      aasta+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: aastatetagi
      aasta+N+Pl+Ess: aastatena
      aasta+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: aastatenagi
      aasta+N+Pl+Trm: aastateni
      aasta+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: aastatenigi
      aasta+N+Pl+Tra: aastateks
      aasta+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: aastatekski
      aasta+N+Pl+Abl: aastatelt
      aasta+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: aastateltki
      aasta+N+Pl+Ade: aastatel
      aasta+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: aastatelgi
      aasta+N+Pl+All: aastatele
      aasta+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: aastatelegi
      aasta+N+Pl+Ela: aastatest
      aasta+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: aastatestki
      aasta+N+Pl+Ine: aastates
      aasta+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: aastateski
      aasta+N+Pl+Ill: aastatesse
      aasta+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: aastatessegi
      aasta+N+Pl+Gen: aastate
      aasta+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: aastategi
      ader+N+Sg+Com: adraga
      ader+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: adragagi
      ader+N+Sg+Abe: adrata
      ader+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: adratagi
      ader+N+Sg+Ess: adrana
      ader+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: adranagi
      ader+N+Sg+Trm: adrani
      ader+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: adranigi
      ader+N+Sg+Tra: adraks
      ader+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: adrakski
      ader+N+Sg+Abl: adralt
      ader+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: adraltki
      ader+N+Sg+Ade: adral
      ader+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: adralgi
      ader+N+Sg+All: adrale
      ader+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: adralegi
      ader+N+Sg+Ela: adrast
      ader+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: adrastki
      ader+N+Sg+Ine: adras
      ader+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: adraski
      ader+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: adrassegi
      ader+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: adrasse
      ader+N+Sg+Gen: adra
      ader+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: adragi
      ader+N+Pl+Nom: adrad
      ader+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: adradki
      ader+N+Sg+Nom: ader
      ader+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: adergi
      aed+N+Sg+Nom: aed
      aed+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: aedki
      aed+N+Sg+Ill: aeda
      aed+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: aedagi
      aed+N+Sg+Par: aeda
      aed+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: aedagi
      aed+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aedasidki
      aed+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: aedasid
      aed+N+Pl+Com: aedadega
      aed+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: aedadegagi
      aed+N+Pl+Abe: aedadeta
      aed+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: aedadetagi
      aed+N+Pl+Ess: aedadena
      aed+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: aedadenagi
      aed+N+Pl+Trm: aedadeni
      aed+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: aedadenigi
      aed+N+Pl+Tra: aedadeks
      aed+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: aedadekski
      aed+N+Pl+Abl: aedadelt
      aed+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: aedadeltki
      aed+N+Pl+Ade: aedadel
      aed+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: aedadelgi
      aed+N+Pl+All: aedadele
      aed+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: aedadelegi
      aed+N+Pl+Ela: aedadest
      aed+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: aedadestki
      aed+N+Pl+Ine: aedades
      aed+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: aedadeski
      aed+N+Pl+Ill: aedadesse
      aed+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: aedadessegi
      aed+N+Pl+Gen: aedade
      aed+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: aedadegi
      aed+N+Pl+Par: aedu
      aed+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: aedugi
      aeg+N+Sg+Nom: aeg
      aeg+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: aegki
      aeg+N+Sg+Ill: aega
      aeg+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: aegagi
      aeg+N+Sg+Par: aega
      aeg+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: aegagi
      aeg+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: aegasidki
      aeg+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: aegasid
      aeg+N+Pl+Com: aegadega
      aeg+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: aegadegagi
      aeg+N+Pl+Abe: aegadeta
      aeg+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: aegadetagi
      aeg+N+Pl+Ess: aegadena
      aeg+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: aegadenagi
      aeg+N+Pl+Trm: aegadeni
      aeg+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: aegadenigi
      aeg+N+Pl+Tra: aegadeks
      aeg+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: aegadekski
      aeg+N+Pl+Abl: aegadelt
      aeg+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: aegadeltki
      aeg+N+Pl+Ade: aegadel
      aeg+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: aegadelgi
      aeg+N+Pl+All: aegadele
      aeg+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: aegadelegi
      aeg+N+Pl+Ela: aegadest
      aeg+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: aegadestki
      aeg+N+Pl+Ine: aegades
      aeg+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: aegadeski
      aeg+N+Pl+Ill: aegadesse
      aeg+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: aegadessegi
      aeg+N+Pl+Gen: aegade
      aeg+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: aegadegi
      aeg+N+Pl+Par: aegu
      aeg+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: aegugi
      ahi+N+Sg+Nom: ahi
      ahi+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: ahigi
      ahi+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: ahjegi
      ahi+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: ahje
      ahi+N+Sg+Com: ahjuga
